Utah statutes.
38-10-115.   Prohibition against removal of property covered by lien -- Penalty.

Any person who removes or causes to be removed any property covered by a validly perfected lien created by this chapter without the written consent of the lien claimant and with the intent to defraud the lien claimant is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

